Tennessee, session 114, HB0361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-601(3)(E), is amended by
deleting "or the general sessions criminal court" and substituting ", the general sessions criminal
court, or a criminal court when the criminal court is hearing a criminal matter involving a
domestic abuse victim, sexual assault victim, or stalking victim"; and by deleting "the general
sessions court" and substituting "the criminal court or the general sessions court".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0361
001748
- 1 -